Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.270

Copies of commission's proceedings, records, acts as evidence.

Copies of the commission's proceedings, records, and acts when certified by the secretary and authenticated by the commission's seal shall be admissible in all courts as prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

[ 1969 c 129 s 27.]